Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144E.123, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Review. Prehospital care data may be reviewed by the director or its designees. The data shall be classified as private data on individuals under chapter 13, the Minnesota Government Data Practices Act.new text begin The director may share with the Washington/Baltimore High Intensity Drug Trafficking Area's Overdose Detection Mapping Application Program (ODMAP) data that identifies where and when an overdose incident happens, fatality status, suspected drug type, naloxone administration, and first responder type. ODMAP may:new text end new text begin (1) allow secure access to the system by authorized users to report information about an overdose incident; new text end new text begin (2) allow secure access to the system by authorized users to view, in near real-time, information about overdose incidents reported; new text end new text begin (3) produce a map in near real-time of the approximate locations of confirmed or suspected overdose incidents reported; and new text end new text begin (4) enable access to overdose incident information that assists in state and local decisions regarding the allocation of public health, public safety, and educational resources for the purposes of monitoring and reporting data related to suspected overdoses. new text end